Massachusetts, session 194th, H2451.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 25N ½ of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2016 Official Edition, is hereby amended in subsection (b) by inserting after the words “primary
care” in line 8 the words “and family medicine”.
SECTION 2. Said subsection (b) of section 25N ½, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by adding the phrase “and family physicians” after “primary care providers” at the end
of the first sentence of the first paragraph.
SECTION 3. Said subsection (b) of section 25N ½, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out in line 23 the number “50” and inserting in place thereof “95”.
SECTION 4. Said subsection (b) of section 25N ½, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the second paragraph the following new paragraph:—
of 2

The health care workforce center shall require applicants to include the following
information and give preference to those applicants whom meet at least one of the following
criteria: (1) Have a proven record of placing graduates in areas of unmet need; (2) Have a record
or written plan of attracting and admitting underrepresented minorities and/or economically
disadvantaged groups; or (3) host their programs and/or clinical training sites in areas of unmet
need.
SECTION 5. Said subsection (b) of section 25N ½, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out the phrase “9 to 12 month” in line 30 and inserting in placing thereof “3
to 4 year”.
SECTION 6. Said subsection (b) of section 25N ½, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by adding at the end of the third paragraph:—
All resident trainees shall be assigned as the primary care provider for a continuity panel
of patients and see those patients in that location no less than 40 weeks per academic year for
each year of the residency.
SECTION 7. Said subsection (b) of section 25N ½, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out the first sentence and inserting in place thereof:—
The health care workforce center shall determine through regulation grant amounts per
full-time resident, provided that grant amounts per resident are no less than 85% of the average
CMS annual reimbursement rate per year and funding is provided for all of the 3 or 4 year
residency.
of 2